de: Griffposition: Zwei; Kein Griff; Seite; Oberseite; Sonstiges
sv: Handtagsposition: Dubbel; Inget handtag; Sidomatning; Topp; Övrigt
nb: Håndtakets posisjon: Dobbel; Ingen håndtak; Side; Topp; Annet
en: Handle position: Dual; No handle; Side; Top; Other
sl-SI: Položaj ročaja: Dvojno; Brez ročaja; Stranski vnos; Zgoraj; Druga
vi: Vị trí tay cầm: Kép; Không có tay cầm; Bên; Trên; Khác
th: ตำแหน่งด้ามจับ: คู่; ไม่มีแฮนเดิล; ทรงด้านข้าง; ด้านบน; อื่นๆ
nl: Handgreepplaatsing: Dubbel; Zonder handvat; Zijkant; Bovenkant; Overig
es: Posición del asa: Doble; Sin asa; Lateral; Superior; Otros
it: Posizione del manico: Doppie; Nessuna impugnatura; Laterale; Parte superiore; Altro
ro-RO: Poziția mânerului: Dublu; Fără mâner; Lateral; Sus; Altele
ja: ハンドルの位置: デュアル; ハンドルなし; 横; 上; その他
pt-BR: Posição da alça: Dual; Sem alça; Lateral; Superior; Outro
da: Skaftposition: Dobbelt; Intet håndtag; Side; Top; Andet
ko: 손잡이 위치: 듀얼; 손잡이 없음; 사이드; 상단; 기타
pl: Położenie uchwytu: Podwójne; Bez uchwytu; Boczne; Górne; Pozostałe
hr-HR: Položaj ručke: Dvostruka; Bez ručke; Sa strane; Gornja strana; Ostalo
sk-SK: Poloha rukoväte: Dvojitý; Bez rukoväte; Bočný; Vrch; Iné
fi: Kahvan sijainti: Kaksiasentoinen; Ei kahvaa; Sivu; Yläosa; Muu
cs: Umístění rukojeti: Dvě rukojeti; Bez rukojeti; Boční rukojeť; Horní rukojeť; Jiné
zh-TW: 提把位置: 雙把手; 無把手; 側面; 上方; 其他
tr: Sap konumu: Çift; Kulpsuz; Yan tarafta; Üst tarafta; Diğer
ru: Расположение рукоятки: Две ручки; Без ручки; Сбоку; Сверху; Другое
pt-PT: Posição da pega: Duplo; Sem punho; Lateral; Superior; Outro
bg-BG: Позиция на дръжката: Двойно; Без дръжка; Странично; Горно; Друго
hu: Nyél pozíciója: Kettős; Nincs fogantyú; Oldalt; Felül; Egyéb
el: Θέση λαβής: Διπλή; Χωρίς λαβή; Πλαϊνό; Επάνω; Άλλο
lt-LT: Rankenos padėtis: Dviguba; Be rankenos; Šoninė; Viršus; Kita
zh-CN: 手柄位置: 双侧; 无手柄; 侧面; 顶部; 其他
fr: Position de la poignée: Double; Pas de poignée; Côté; Haut; Autre